Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.060

Identification and dissemination of resources and materials to encourage interdisciplinary instruction and project-based learning.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance, must identify and disseminate resources and materials to elementary, middle, and high schools that are intended to encourage and increase interdisciplinary instruction and project-based learning in STEM.

(2) In collaboration with work groups of STEM educators and using the work of regional STEM networks and innovation grant recipients under RCW 28A.188.050, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must:

(a) Identify interdisciplinary STEM instructional modules appropriate for different grade levels;

(b) Identify project-based learning models, projects, lessons, and guides appropriate for different grade levels; and

(c) Make the information collected in this section, including online resource guides, available for teachers to incorporate into their classroom instruction.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must also disseminate information and research on best practices in interdisciplinary instruction and project-based learning in STEM.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 5.]